Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 2. Insurance Plans

Cross references. —

As to professional liability insurance for peace officers, see §

9-2-1017

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

44A Am. Jur. 2d Insurance §§ 1828 to 1863.

Insurer's demand for additional or corrected proof of loss as suspending running of contractual limitation provision, 15 ALR2d 955.

Insurer's admission of liability, offers of settlement, negotiations and the like, as waiver of or estoppel to assert contractual limitation provision, 29 ALR2d 636.

Scope of provision in group health or accident insurance policy excluding from coverage sickness or accidents arising out of or in the course of employment, 47 ALR2d 1240.

Termination of coverage under group policy with regard to termination of employment, 68 ALR2d 8.

Time of disability or death with regard to termination of coverage under group policy, 68 ALR2d 150.

Cancellation or modification of master policy as termination of coverage under group policy, 68 ALR2d 249.

Conflict of laws as to group insurance, 72 ALR2d 695.

Waiver or estoppel on basis of statements in promotional or explanatory literature issued to insureds, 36 ALR3d 541.

Provision excluding from coverage part-time or temporary employees, 41 ALR3d 1419.

Validity and effect of choice-of-law provision in group insurance policy, 53 ALR3d 1095.

Construction of provision limiting coverage to full-time employees, 57 ALR3d 801.

Construction of provision limiting coverage to active employees or to persons working actively in conduct of business, 58 ALR3d 993.

What is “conveyance,” “passenger conveyance” or “public conveyance,” within coverage of accident policy, 60 ALR3d 858.

Who is “fare-paying passenger” within coverage provision of life or accident insurance policy, 60 ALR3d 1273.

What conditions constitute “disease” within terms of life, accident, disability, or hospitalization insurance policy, 61 ALR3d 822.

Effective date of group life insurance as to individual policies of employees, 66 ALR3d 1175.

Right of insured under individual policy to coverage afforded by group policy from which he directly transferred on termination of his employment, 66 ALR3d 1192.

Elimination of particular coverage or termination of health, hospitalization or medical care insurance policy as affecting insurer's liability for insured's continuing hospitalization or medical expenses relating to previously covered illness, 66 ALR3d 1205.

Group insurance: construction, application and effect of policy provision extending conversion privilege to employee after termination of employment, 32 ALR4th 1037.

§ 9-3-201.
Group prepaid plans authorized; agreements with insurance companies authorized; limitation on authorized plans and companies; payroll deductions; self-insurance programs; optional school district participation in plan.

The state of Wyoming and its political subdivisions and school districts may obtain group prepaid plans or insurance for life, health, accident or hospitalization for their employees and for elected officials, except for members of the legislature, and enter into agreements with prepaid plans or insurance companies to provide this coverage. Insurance coverage for school district or board of cooperative educational services employees meeting the definition of employee under W.S. 9-3-203(a)(iv), shall, if elected by the district or board under subsection (e) of this section, be provided through the state employees’ and officials’ group insurance plan in accordance with W.S.

9-3-202

through

9-3-218

. Insurance coverage for retired school district or board of cooperative educational services employees shall, if elected by the board or district under subsection (e) of this section and if the retired employee was continuously covered under the board’s or district’s insurance plan prior to the election, be provided through the state employees’ and officials’ group insurance plan in accordance with W.S.

9-3-202

through

9-3-218

. If a school district or board of cooperative educational services elects to cease participation in the group insurance plan pursuant to subsection (f) of this section, the election shall apply to retired employees of that board or district who are receiving coverage under this subsection.

Prepaid plans or insurance shall be procured only from prepaid plans authorized to do business in the state of Wyoming or from insurance companies authorized to do business in the state of Wyoming and under the full jurisdiction of the Wyoming insurance commissioner.

Upon a request in writing from any employee of the state of Wyoming, any covered political subdivision thereof or a participating school district, the state auditor or the proper officer in any political subdivision or school district may deduct from the wages of the employee the amount of the premium which the employee has agreed to pay for the prepaid plans or insurance, and to pay or remit the payment directly to the prepaid plan or insurance company issuing the group plan or insurance.

The state and any political subdivision are authorized to utilize a self-insurance program, provided that a defined plan with proper funding is first adopted and the cost of the plan is included in the annual budget and provided the self-insurance program includes any coverage mandated by Wyoming insurance law. Any self-insurance program, including the Wyoming state employees’ and officials’ group insurance plan, adopted pursuant to this section shall be within the jurisdiction of the insurance commissioner under the provisions of title 26, Wyoming statutes.

Any school district or board of cooperative educational services may elect to participate in the state employees’ and officials’ group insurance plan by filing notification of election with the department of administration and information on a form and in a manner as prescribed by the department. Participation in the plan for any electing board or district shall commence not less than one hundred twenty (120) days following the date on which the board or district filed notification under this subsection and shall be identical to plans and coverage provided other enrollees under this act. The department shall notify the electing board or district of the date on which the board or district is eligible to participate in the state group insurance plan. An election by a board or district to participate in the state group insurance plan under this subsection is irrevocable for a period of five (5) years from the date on which plan participation originally commenced. In addition to all other remedies available to the department, if a district or board withdraws from the state group insurance plan during the period of irrevocability, the department may assess against the withdrawing board or district the amount by which all claims paid on behalf of employees of the board or district exceeds total premiums paid by the board or district and their employees. A board or district may renew its initial participation in the state group insurance plan without interruption upon submitting notification of renewal to the department prior to expiration of the initial five (5) year participation period. Renewal of plan participation shall be irrevocable for an additional period of not less than five (5) years.

Any school district or board of cooperative educational services which has elected to participate in the state employees’ and officials’ group insurance plan under subsection (e) of this section may, upon expiration of the initial five (5) years of plan participation required under subsection (e) of this section, elect to cease participation in the state group insurance plan by filing notification of the election to the department on a form and in a manner prescribed by the department. An election under this subsection shall prohibit the board or district from participation in the state group insurance plan for a period of five (5) years commencing on the date plan participation ceased. Participation in the plan for any board or district electing to cease plan participation under this subsection shall be discontinued on a date determined by the department in consultation with the board or district, but in no event later than one hundred twenty (120) days following the date on which the board or district filed notification under this subsection.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 174, §§ 1 to 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-340.1 to 9-340.3; W.S. 1977, §§

9-5-301

to

9-5-303

; Laws 1978, ch. 15, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1983, ch. 189, § 1; 1987, ch. 194, § 1; 1989, ch. 245, § 1; 2010, ch. 106, § 1; 2014 ch. 17, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Cross references. —

As to insurance commissioner, see §

26-2-102

.

The 2010 amendment,

in (a), added the last three sentences; in (c), inserted “any covered political subdivision thereof or a participating school district”; and added (e) and (f).

Laws 2010, ch. 106, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2010.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (a), (e) and (f), inserted “or board of cooperative educational services,” inserted “or board,” substituted “board or” for “school” or variation of; deleted “on and after July 1, 2010” in two places in (a); and in (e), added the present fifth sentence.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (c), substituted “auditor” for “treasurer.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 164, § 2, states as follows: “It is the intention of the legislature that the extended health insurance coverage for the dependents of employees or officials who die while acting within the course of their employment provided for in section 1 of this act constitutes payment pursuant to a moral obligation of the state as recognized by the Wyoming Supreme Court in State v. Carter, 30 Wyo. 223 (1923).”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2007, ch. 164, § 3, states as follows: “From the effective date of this act through the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2008, there is appropriated fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) from the general fund to the state auditor for purposes of this act.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Group insurance: binding effects of limitations on or exclusions of coverage contained in master group policy but not in literature given individual insureds, 6 ALR4th 835.

§ 9-3-202.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “State Employees and Officials Group Insurance Act”.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 243, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-700; W.S. 1977, §

9-13-101

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 194, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “This act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-3-203(a)(xiv).

§ 9-3-203.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 55, § 3.

“Carrier” means a private insurance company or health maintenance organization, as defined in W.S. 26-34-102(a)(xvi), holding a valid outstanding certificate of authority from the state insurance commissioner, or a nonprofit hospital service plan or a nonprofit medical service plan incorporated as a nonprofit corporation, either of which has had successful experience in the group health insurance field as determined by the commissioner of insurance;

“Dependent” means an employee’s spouse and each unmarried child under the age of twenty-six (26) years, including adopted children, stepchildren and foster children. “Dependent” includes an otherwise qualified dependent of a deceased employee as provided in W.S. 9-3-209(d);

“Employee” means any employee of a participating school district or participating board of cooperative educational services whose salary is paid by funds of the district or board, or any official or employee of the state of Wyoming whose salary is paid by state funds, including employees and faculty members of the University of Wyoming and various community colleges in the state, except persons employed on intermittent, irregular, or less than halftime basis and any at-will contract employee who does not meet the requirements established under W.S. 9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(III) or (IV). “Employee” shall not include employees of the agricultural extension service of the University of Wyoming who hold federal civil service appointments, are required to participate in federal civil service retirement and who elect to participate in the federal employees’ health benefit program as authorized in W.S. 9-3-210(d);

“Group insurance plan” means the health and life insurance plans defined in this section, the flexible benefits plan or any other group insurance coverages contracted for by the department, including disability insurance, as defined in W.S. 26-5-103(a);

“Health insurance plan” means a group insurance policy or contract or a medical or hospital service agreement or other health care delivery system provided by a carrier or carriers for the purpose of paying for or reimbursing the cost of hospital and medical care;

“Hospital and medical benefits” means hospital room and board, other hospital services, certain outpatient benefits, maternity benefits, surgical benefits, including obstetrical care, in-hospital medical care, diagnostic X-ray and laboratory benefits, physician’s services provided by house and office calls, prescription drugs, outpatient psychiatric services and other benefits determined by the department. Benefits may be provided on a coinsurance basis, the insured to pay a proportion of the cost of benefits;

“Life insurance plan” means a group insurance policy or contract provided by a carrier for the purpose of providing life insurance;

“Official” means any elected or appointed state official who receives compensation other than expense reimbursement from state funds, except for members of the legislature and officials serving on an intermittent, irregular or less than halftime basis;

“Supplemental health insurance plan” or “supplemental plan” means a group insurance contract or a medical or hospital service agreement provided by a carrier for the purpose of paying for or reimbursing the cost of hospital and medical care in excess of or supplemental to medicare or medicaid, or both, which employees or officials and their dependents may be eligible to receive. Supplemental coverage may consist of one (1), a combination of, or alternative plans in the discretion of the department;

“Department” means the department of administration and information;

“Flexible benefits plan” means a plan of benefits established by department rules and regulations and adopted pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, Title 26 of the United States code and qualified under § 125 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. The plan may include benefits authorized by the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and related federal regulations which are consistent with Wyoming law;

“Retiree” means an individual who has terminated his working career as an employee of an employing entity participating in the group insurance plan and who is eligible to receive a retirement benefit under the Wyoming retirement system;

“Participating board of cooperative educational services” means any board of educational services formed pursuant to W.S.

21-20-104

which has elected to participate in the state employees’ and officials’ group insurance plan under W.S.

9-3-201

(e) and which has not discontinued plan participation pursuant to an election under W.S.

9-3-201

(f);

“Participating school district” means any school district which has elected to participate in the state employees’ and officials’ group insurance plan under W.S. 9-3-201(e) and which has not discontinued plan participation pursuant to an election under W.S. 9-3-201(f);

“Voluntary participating employer” includes a participating board of cooperative educational services and participating school district;

“This act” means W.S.

9-3-202

through

9-3-219

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 243, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 9-701; Laws 1971, ch. 219, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

9-13-102

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 194, § 1; 1989, ch. 43, § 1; 1990, ch. 14, § 1; 1991, ch. 223, § 1; 1993, ch. 1, § 1; 1994, ch. 59, § 1; 1996, ch. 110, § 1; 1998, ch. 32, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 2; 2001, ch. 55, §§ 2, 3; ch. 102, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 45, § 1; 2007, ch. 164, § 1; 2010, ch. 106, § 1; 2014 ch. 17, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2016 ch. 17, § 1, effective March 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 189, § 3, effective April 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 46, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(iii) added the last sentence.

The 2010 amendment,

in (a)(iv), inserted “employee of a participating school district whose salary is paid by school district funds, or any”; and added (a)(xv).

Laws 2010, ch. 106, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2010.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014,
in the first sentence of (a)(iv), inserted “or participating
board of cooperative educational services,” and substituted
“funds of the district or board” for “school
district funds”; added (a)(xiv) and (a)(xvi); and redesignated
former (a)(xiv) as (a)(xvii).

The 2016 amendment

, added “for members of the legislature” preceding “and officials serving on” in (a)(ix).

Laws 2016, ch. 17, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2016.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 1, 2020, in (a)(xvii), substituted "W.S.

9-3-202

through

9-3-219

" for "W.S.

9-3-202

through

9-3-218

."

The 2020 amendment

, effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(iii) substituted “spouse and each” for “spouse, each” and “age of twenty-six (26) years” for “age of eighteen (18)” and deleted “and each unmarried child between the age of eighteen (18) and twenty-three (23) years who is a full-time student in an accredited educational or vocational institution, and for whom the employee is the major source of financial support” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2021 amendment

substituted “9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(III) or (IV)” for “9-2-1022(a)(xi)(F)(III) or (IV)” in the first sentence of (a)(iv).

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws, 2007, ch. 164, § 2 provides: “Section 2. It is the intention of the legislature that the extended health insurance coverage for the dependents of employees or officials who die while acting within the course of their employment provided for in section 1 of this act constitutes payment pursuant to a moral obligation of the state as recognized by the Wyoming Supreme Court in State v. Carter, 30 Wyo. 223 (1923).”

Transfer of state employees' and officials' group insurance board of administration. —

See note under same catchline following §

9-3-204

.

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 189 § 6, provides: "This act applies to air ambulance transport services provided on or after April 1, 2020."

§ 9-3-204.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 55, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to the state employees' and officials' group health insurance board, see §

9-2-1022

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1967, ch. 243, § 3, related to the state employees' and officials' group health insurance board of administration.

Transfer of state employees' and officials' group insurance board of administration. —

Laws 2001, ch. 55, § 4(a), effective July 1, 2001, transfers all positions, personnel, appropriations, property, equipment and authority in the state employees' and officials' group insurance board of administration to the department of administration and information.

§ 9-3-205.
Administration and management of group insurance program; powers and duties; adoption of rules and regulations; interfund borrowing authority.

The department shall administer and manage the state employees’ and officials’ group insurance program in accordance with all provisions of title 26 of the Wyoming statutes governing group health benefit plans and rules promulgated thereto. The department, subject to the provisions of this act:

Shall prepare specifications for the health insurance plan and a supplemental plan, the life insurance plan and any other group insurance plan contracted for by the department;

Shall contract with carriers to underwrite group or supplemental insurance plans;

Shall determine the methods of claims administration, consistent with title 26 of the Wyoming statutes, under group insurance or supplemental plans, whether by the state or carrier or both;

Shall determine the eligibility of employees, officials and their dependents to participate in group insurance and supplemental plans;

Shall determine the amount of employee payroll deductions;

Shall establish a procedure by which the department shall hear complaints by insured employees concerning the allowance and payment of claims, eligibility for coverage and other matters. The department shall take into consideration the authority of the department of insurance to investigate complaints pursuant to title 26 of the Wyoming statutes when establishing this procedure. Unless otherwise provided in the group insurance or supplemental plan or plans, any decision of the department upon complaints is not binding upon either the employee or carrier and the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall not apply to the proceedings. The group insurance or supplemental plan or plans may provide that the decision of the department shall be binding upon both the employee and the carrier as to certain disputes and in such event the procedure adopted by the department shall conform to the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act;

Shall administer state group insurance reserve monies;

Shall continuously study the operation of the group insurance plan including analysis of:

Gross and net costs, including administrative costs;

Claims administration;

Comprehensive health claims utilization information to determine the causes of plan health care cost increases and strategies to control those costs;

Factors in the plan’s design that may adversely affect participation;

The effect of benefit changes;

Contribution levels and recommendations to attract a broad mix of participants to the plan;

Demographic information about existing and eligible participants;

Trends in costs and benefits of the plan relative to other plans.

May enter into a contract with a carrier to underwrite a supplemental plan and negotiate and enter into amendments to existing health insurance contracts to provide a supplemental plan and determine an effective date;

May determine that employees, officials and their dependents who are eligible for medicare or medicaid, or both, shall be eligible for a supplemental plan and, upon the effective date of the supplemental plan as to employees, officials and their dependents presently covered by the health insurance plan, may transfer them from the health insurance plan to the supplemental plan;

May negotiate and enter into amendments to existing contracts providing group insurance and supplemental plans to provide appropriate coverage for employees and officials who may become eligible for coverage after the effective date of those contracts and to provide for their enrollment;

May contract with carriers to underwrite optional group insurance plans which may be additions to or supplemental to those plans contracted under this act and which are paid for entirely by employees and officials, entirely by the employer, or by both. The contracts shall be designed to provide the fullest benefits at the lowest cost, and the department may contract with the same carriers for the optional group insurance plans as for the other plans contracted for under this act;

May contract with any person for the furnishing of actuarial services, the preparation of specifications for group insurance plans and other specialized services which cannot be performed by the department or by state employees. Contracts for these services shall be awarded through responsible competitive bidding at intervals as the department determines, and shall be reviewed annually by the department;

May develop, implement and administer a flexible benefits plan and may contract with carriers, third-party administrators or other professionals to develop, administer and implement a flexible benefits plan;

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 55, § 3.

Have authority to audit payroll records of voluntary participating employers to ensure compliance with requirements of this act.

The department shall adopt rules and regulations consistent with the provisions of this act as necessary to carry out its statutory duties and responsibilities under this act.

For the purposes of determining financial condition, ability to fulfill and the manner of fulfillment of its statutory duties, the nature of its operations and compliance with law, the insurance commissioner shall examine the affairs, accounts, records and assets of the Wyoming state employees’ and officials’ group insurance plan, as often as he deems advisable but not less frequently than every three (3) years. The insurance commissioner may adopt rules consistent with the provisions of this act and title 26 of the Wyoming statutes to identify procedures for conducting examinations of the Wyoming state employees’ and officials’ group insurance program.

The department shall report the results of the analysis conducted pursuant to paragraph (a)(viii) of this section and suggested activities to manage the plan by December 1 of each year to a committee of the legislature designated by the management council.

Upon request of the director of the department, the state treasurer and the state auditor may utilize interfund loans from the legislative stabilization reserve account to cover the costs of group insurance plan coverage to school districts electing to participate in the group insurance plan under W.S. 9-3-201(e) or the costs of discontinuing plan coverage to districts electing to cease participation under W.S. 9-3-201(f). The interfund loans shall be repaid as soon as anticipated revenue is received. The total amount of interfund loans under this subsection outstanding at any one (1) time shall not exceed sixty million dollars ($60,000,000.00). The interest charged on each interfund loan under this subsection shall be the interest rate earned on pooled fund investments in the previous fiscal year.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 243, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 9-703; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

9-13-104

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 194, § 1; 1989, ch. 245, § 1; 1990, ch. 14, § 1; 1991, ch. 223, § 1; 2001, ch. 55, §§ 2, 3; 2008, ch. 116, § 1; 2010, ch. 106, § 1; 2014 ch. 17, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2018 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 43, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 46, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2008 amendment

made a stylistic change.

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2010 amendment,

added (e).

Laws 2010, ch. 106, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2010.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (e), substituted “loans from the legislative stabilization reserve account” for “loans from the general fund or the budget reserve account” and added the last sentence.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (a) substituted “program in accordance with all provisions of title 26 of the Wyoming statutes governing group health benefit plans and rules promulgated thereto. The department, subject to” for “program and, subject to”; in (a)(iii) added “consistent with title 26 of the Wyoming statutes” following “claims administration”; in (a)(vi) added the second sentence; and in (c) added the last sentence.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in the first sentence of (a), deleted “state” preceding “employees,” and substituted “employer” for “state”; and added (a)(xvi).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (e), inserted “under this subsection” in two places.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to throughout subsections (a) and (b), see § 9-3-203(a)(xiv).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2010, ch. 106, § 2, provides: “Notwithstanding W.S.

9-3-207

, any eligible employee of a school district electing participation in the state employees' and officials' group insurance plan under W.S. 9-3-205(e), as amended under section 1 of this act, shall have thirty-one (31) days from the date the school district becomes a participating school district and the district's employees are eligible for participation in the state plan, to elect to be enrolled or not be enrolled in the group insurance plan.
A participating school district's employees shall become eligible on the date the school district's election is effective under W.S. 9-3-201(c), as amended under section 1 of this act.”

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Judicial remedies. —

Although the board [now department] had established its grievance procedure to address an insured's dispute concerning “insurance claims and coverage” as an exclusive remedy, the board [now department] did not provide an administrative remedy for denial of treatment decisions during the utilization review process, therefor, claimant was permitted to seek judicial remedy. Long v. Great West Life & Annuity Ins. Co., 957 P.2d 823,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1998), reh'g denied,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. May 15, 1998).

Applied

in

State Ex Rel. Arnold v. Ommen, 2009 WY 24, 201 P.3d 1127,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Feb. 24, 2009).

Cited

in

Davis v. State, 910 P.2d 555,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1996).

§ 9-3-206.
Specifications for insurance plan; submission of bids; change of carriers; notice of rate changes or intent of carrier not to renew; premium tax exemption.

The specifications drawn by the department for the health insurance plan shall include hospital and medical benefits, and comparable benefits for employees who rely solely on spiritual means for healing. The specification drawn by the department for the life insurance plan and any other group insurance plan shall include benefits as determined by the department. Bids shall be submitted to the department within time limits established by the department and, in addition to the carrier’s cost proposal, shall include an explanation of the method of claims administration proposed by the carrier and the cost thereof, the amount of total premiums to be retained by the carrier, the purpose for which these retained funds would be allocated, and other information requested by the department.

The department may:

Call for bids and change carriers at its discretion;

Terminate an existing contract at any time upon sixty (60) days notice in the event of unsatisfactory performance or noncompliance with the terms of the contract by the carrier.

Any carrier under contract with the department shall give the department sixty (60) days notice of any proposed rate change in the contract specifications or intent not to renew the contract. If the department and the carrier agree during the sixty (60) day period to any rate change in the specifications, the department may renew the contract, as changed, without reopening to bids.

If the department decides to change carriers or to reopen bids on the underwriting of any aspect of the group insurance plan, it shall follow the same procedures in the selection of a subsequent carrier as it did in awarding the initial contract.

Any carrier underwriting any portion of the state’s group insurance plan is exempt from paying premium taxes under W.S.

26-4-103

on that portion of its business representing premiums collected from the group insurance plan.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 243, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 9-704; Laws 1971, ch. 219, §§ 2, 3; W.S. 1977, §

9-13-105

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 194, § 1; 2001, ch. 55, § 2.

§ 9-3-207.
Eligibility for membership in plan; state employees; 31 day period to elect enrollment; new employees; later enrollment.

Any state employee eligible for membership in the group insurance plan at the time the plan becomes effective shall have thirty-one (31) days to either elect to be enrolled or not be enrolled in the plan. The department shall establish the procedure by which eligible employees shall notify the department of their decision within the prescribed thirty-one (31) day period.

An eligible employee who enters state service or service of a voluntary participating employer has thirty-one (31) days from the initial date of employment to elect to be enrolled or not be enrolled in the group insurance plan.

Employees who elect not to be enrolled within the time prescribed in subsections (a) and (b) of this section may be enrolled at a later date upon conditions the department may impose, such as a physical examination or the exclusion of preexisting conditions from coverage.

A retiree is eligible for coverage under the group insurance plan subject to the provisions of W.S.

9-3-218

.

An eligible employee of a voluntary participating employer shall have thirty-one (31) days from the date the employer becomes a participating employer and the employees thereof are eligible for participation in the state plan, to elect to be enrolled or not be enrolled in the group insurance plan. A voluntary participating employer’s employees shall become eligible on the date the employer’s election is effective under W.S. 9-3-201(c).

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 243, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 9-705; W.S. 1977, §

9-13-106

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 194, § 1; 1991, ch. 223, § 1; 2001, ch. 55, § 2; ch. 102, § 2; 2014 ch. 17, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

in (b), deleted “state” preceding “employee” and inserted “or service of a voluntary participating employer” following “service” and added (e).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2010, ch. 106, § 2, provides: “Notwithstanding W.S.

9-3-207

, any eligible employee of a school district electing participation in the state employees' and officials' group insurance plan under W.S. 9-3-205(e), as amended under section 1 of this act, shall have thirty-one (31) days from the date the school district becomes a participating school district and the district's employees are eligible for participation in the state plan, to elect to be enrolled or not be enrolled in the group insurance plan.
A participating school district's employees shall become eligible on the date the school district's election is effective under W.S. 9-3-201(c), as amended under section 1 of this act.”

§ 9-3-208.
State officials; 31 day period to elect enrollment; newly appointed or elected officials; later enrollment.

State officials eligible for membership in the group insurance plan at the time the plan becomes effective shall have thirty-one (31) days to either elect to become enrolled or not become enrolled in the plan. The election shall be made according to procedures established by the department.

Eligible state officials appointed or elected after the effective date of the group insurance plan have thirty-one (31) days after the date they officially take office to elect to become enrolled or not become enrolled in the plan.

Eligible state officials who elect not to become enrolled within the time prescribed in subsections (a) and (b) of this section may be enrolled at a later date upon conditions the department may impose, such as a physical examination or the exclusion of preexisting conditions from coverage.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 243, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 9-706; W.S. 1977, §

9-13-107

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 194, § 1; 1991, ch. 223, § 1; 2001, ch. 55, § 2.

§ 9-3-209.
Dependents; election of coverage; later election; change in number of dependents; extended coverage.

Any eligible employee or official may elect to have his dependents covered by the group insurance plan. The election shall be made at the time the employee or official becomes enrolled in the plan, under procedures the department may establish. If dependent coverage is not elected at the time that an employee or official becomes enrolled in the plan, dependent coverage may be elected at a later date under conditions the department may impose, such as physical examination or the exclusion of preexisting conditions from coverage.

Any employee or official who has elected to have his dependents covered as provided in subsection (a) of this section, and who subsequently has a change in the number of his dependents, may at the time of the change increase or decrease the number of his dependents covered by the group insurance plan under procedures established by the department.

Any employee or official who has no eligible dependents at the time he becomes enrolled in the group insurance plan, and who later has an eligible dependent may, at the time his dependency status changes, elect coverage for the dependent under procedures established by the department.

The dependents of any employee or official who has elected to have his dependents covered as provided in subsection (a) of this section, and who suffers a work related death as a result of employment as an official or employee, shall continue to be covered for a period of six (6) months after the date of the employee’s or official’s death. The state auditor shall ascertain the employing agency’s contribution pursuant to W.S.

9-3-210

for the six (6) month period and shall pay the department the amount required for the coverage. The dependents shall be responsible for any portion required to be paid by the employee for coverage during the six (6) month period.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 243, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 9-707; W.S. 1977, §

9-13-108

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 194, § 1; 2001, ch. 55, § 2; 2007, ch. 164, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (d).

Editor's notes. —

Laws, 2007, ch. 164, § 2 provides: “Section 2. It is the intention of the legislature that the extended health insurance coverage for the dependents of employees or officials who die while acting within the course of their employment provided for in section 1 of this act constitutes payment pursuant to a moral obligation of the state as recognized by the Wyoming Supreme Court in State v. Carter, 30 Wyo. 223 (1923).”

Applied

in

State Ex Rel. Arnold v. Ommen, 2009 WY 24, 201 P.3d 1127,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Feb. 24, 2009).